Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1776.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "United States
and Oklahoma Flag Display Rights Act of 2025".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 155.1 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
HB1776 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

A. No state or local government entity shall prohibit any
person from displaying either the flag of the United States of
America or the flag of the State of Oklahoma on property owned by or
lawfully occupied by such state or local government entity if the
display is made from a vehicle owned by or lawfully operated by such
person or if the display is being made by the person holding the
flag whether or not the display is made from a vehicle and if the
flag is being displayed in accordance with accepted standards for
the proper and respectful display of such flag and the flag has not
been altered or modified or defaced in any way.
B. The provisions of this section shall be applicable to a
motorcycle owned or lawfully operated by such person or any other
vehicle authorized pursuant to law to be operated on public roads or
highways.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended.




HB1776 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.